Washington statutes.
RCW 35.49.100

Payment in error—Remedy.

If, through error or inadvertence, a person pays any assessment for a local improvement or an installment thereof upon the lands of another, he or she may, after demand and refusal, recover from the owner of such lands, by an action in the superior court, the amount so paid and the costs of the action.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2088; 1965 c 7 s 35.49.100. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 65; RRS s 9418.]